Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Chapter 23. Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium
§ 55-23-35.
Repayment of contribution of Hinds County.

It is the intent of the Legislature that Hinds County, Mississippi, be fully reimbursed for the amount of money contributed by it to the enlargement and renovation of Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium. To that end, the State Treasurer shall pay to the county out of any excess in the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium Bond Sinking Fund not necessary to pay the debt service on bonds issued pursuant to Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43 an amount not to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per year or, in his discretion, a greater sum which will expedite such repayment provided the revenue paid into the fund exceeds that projected at the time of passage of Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43; provided, however, the percentage of money paid Hinds County shall not exceed the percentage of the state obligation which has been paid. In the event the state refunds bonds issued under Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43, the obligation created hereunder to Hinds County shall not be construed to impair such refunding issue but shall be a continuing subordinate obligation of the state until its repayment is effected.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) to the contrary, the Board of Supervisors of Hinds County may forgive and cancel all or any portion of such obligation of the commission or the State of Mississippi incurred pursuant to Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43, by resolution duly entered at any regular meeting to be held, or previously held, in calendar year 1989. However, if the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium is sold, or any interest in same is permanently conveyed by the State of Mississippi, then Hinds County shall be paid all sums which were previously forgiven or cancelled by Hinds County in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 360, § 8; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 55-23-37.
Issuance of warrants for payment of bonds.

The State Treasurer is hereby authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the State Fiscal Management Board the necessity for warrants, and the State Fiscal Management Board is hereby authorized and directed to issue such warrants payable out of the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium Bond Sinking Fund authorized by Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43 for such purpose, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of and interest on all bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of said bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 360, § 9; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 55-23-39.
Proceedings for issuance of bonds; validation of bonds.

Such general obligation bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43. Any resolution providing for the issuance of general obligation bonds under the provisions of Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43 shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular, special or adjourned meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

The bonds authorized under the authority of Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43 may be validated in the Chancery Court of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The necessary papers for such validation proceedings shall be transmitted to the State Bond Commission, and the required notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 360, § 10; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 55-23-41.
Mississippi Memorial Stadium Construction Fund; use of Hinds County funds.

The proceeds of the bonds authorized in Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43 and funds appropriated for the enlargement and renovation of the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium, including the funds to be supplied by Hinds County and also including funds from any and all other sources set aside for such enlargement and renovation by the Building Commission shall be used for the purpose of enlarging and renovating all physical components which make up the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium and, except for the funds contributed by Hinds County, shall be deposited in the Mississippi Memorial Stadium Construction Fund, hereby created in the State Treasury. The funds contributed by Hinds County shall be deposited as provided in Section 55-23-23. To that end the commission is hereby authorized and empowered to make and enter into such contracts and execute such instruments containing such reasonably appropriate terms and conditions as, in its discretion, it may deem necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of carrying out the terms of Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43, including the acceptance of that proportion of the cost of improvements required by the terms of Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43 to be contributed by Hinds County. Any funds received by the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium Commission under Section 55-23-8, may be used for any purpose authorized in this section or Section 55-23-8, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 360, § 11; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 602, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2001.).

§ 55-23-43.
Employment of architects, engineers, etc.; letting of contracts; payment of stadium enlargement and renovation expenses pursuant to Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43.

The Building Commission may employ competent architects, engineers and other qualified agents to prepare plans, specifications and such other data as may be necessary to enable it to carry out the purposes of Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43 in a manner consistent with sound construction principles. When the plans and specifications have been approved and accepted by the Building Commission, contracts for the various phases of construction shall then be let by the Building Commission in the manner provided by law to competent and responsible firms or individuals whose work shall proceed under the constant inspection of a reliable and competent inspector to be furnished for that purpose by the State Building Commission. All expenses incurred in the enlargement and renovation under the provisions of Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43 shall be paid from the Mississippi Memorial Stadium Construction Fund created herein. The Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium Commission may take any action authorized in Section 55-23-8, relating to the property described in such section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 360, § 12; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 602, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2001.).

§ 55-23-45.
Authorization of repair, remodeling and enlargement of stadium; public parking facilities.

The Building Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to repair and remodel the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium and, notwithstanding the seating capacity limitations set out in Sections 55-23-21 through 55-23-43, to enlarge said stadium as funds become available for said purpose. The parking facilities shall not be extended any farther to the east than as the facilities existed on January 1, 1996. Further, the portion of the state-owned property on which the stadium and parking facilities are located, except the property west of the stadium between the stadium and North West Street, that was undeveloped as of January 1, 1996, shall remain undeveloped unless the Legislature enacts legislation approving the development of such property. The portion of state-owned property on which the stadium is located that is west of the stadium between the stadium and North West Street may be developed to provide parking facilities for the Mississippi Department of Transportation offices located on North West Street. The Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium Commission may take any action authorized in Section 55-23-8, relating to the property described in such section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 360, § 13; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 552, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 602, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2001.).

§ 55-23-47.
Provisions governing repair, remodeling and enlargement of stadium.

The repairing, remodeling and enlarging of the Mississippi Memorial Stadium shall be carried on throughout in accordance with the provisions of Section 12, Chapter 390, Laws of 1960.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 534, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 360, § 13; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 55-23-49.
Funding of repair, remodeling and enlargement of stadium.

The cost of repairing, remodeling and enlarging the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium shall be paid from any funds appropriated by the Legislature for such purposes, or from the sale of revenue bonds or general obligation bonds issued for this purpose, as may be hereafter authorized by the Legislature. The costs of construction of improvements made under Section 55-23-8, may be paid from any funds provided under this section or Section 55-23-8, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 534, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 360, § 13; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 5; Laws, 2001, ch. 602, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2001.).

§ 55-23-51.
Designation of athletic field as “A.C. (Butch) Lambert Field.”

The athletic field at the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium in Jackson, Mississippi, shall be named the “A.C. (Butch) Lambert Field.” The Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium Commission shall erect appropriate signs and markers at the stadium to indicate the name of the field.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 301, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 55-23-53.
Scheduling of football games at stadium.

Prior to January 1, 1990, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall develop a proposal to encourage scheduling of football games by Mississippi universities in the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium, which scheduling will acknowledge the obligation of such universities to support the enlarged stadium, the expansion of which was encouraged by such universities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 548, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).